Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1906
Transnational repression; Nebraska State Patrol; report.

The Nebraska State Patrol may prepare or commission an empirical and qualitative report on the threat of transnational repression in Nebraska and electronically submit such report to the Legislature.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 19.